Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1002.04
Municipalities; joint operation of electric systems; register with board; reports; action subject to review or approval.

Two or more municipalities owning or operating separate electric systems that join together for the purpose of facilitating the performance of any of their respective powers or duties shall, before such a group of municipalities commences operations, register with the Nebraska Power Review Board on such forms as the board may prescribe and containing such information as the board may request. Such a group shall comply with any additional reporting requirements the board imposes that are applied to individual municipalities. Any action taken by an individual municipality that is subjected to the Nebraska Power Review Board review or approval, shall, if taken by a group of municipalities, be subject to similar review or approval.

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 56.